Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Geographer

151.810.
State geographer — Appointment — Duties.

There is created the Office of State Geographer. The state geographer shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve for a term of one (1) year. No one (1) person shall be appointed state geographer for two (2) terms in succession nor shall the state geographer be from the same institution of higher education as the person immediately preceding him as state geographer. The state geographer shall serve without compensation.

The state geographer shall be a person who holds a graduate degree in geography from an accredited college or university and who has demonstrated a professional knowledge of Kentucky geography through his teaching or research activities.

To the extent funds permit, the state geographer shall:

Utilize the facilities of geography departments of major universities in the state;

Advise state officials and agencies on geographic matters;

Serve as a resource for teachers of geography and for publishers of geography textbooks and atlases;

Assist state and local officials with boundary studies;

Advise state and local agencies on mapping and cartographic programs;

Assist state and local officials with planning, zoning and land-use studies;

Cooperate with other states in exchanging geographic information; and

Compile, analyze and disseminate geographic information necessary to perform the foregoing duties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.